Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB252.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 304 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 304. Special Tax Provisions for Poverty.--* * *(e) (1) A taxpayer who is sixty-five years of age or older and would otherwise qualify for one hundred per cent tax forgiveness under subsection (d)(1) in a taxable year shall not be required to file a tax return under this article for that taxable year.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (2) A taxpayer and a taxpayer's spouse who are sixty-five years of age or older and would otherwise qualify for one hundred per cent tax forgiveness under subsection (d)(1) in a taxable year shall not be required to file a tax return under this article for that taxable year.Section 2. Section 330(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 330. Returns and Liability.--(a) On or before the date when the taxpayer's Federal income tax return is due or would be due if the taxpayer were required to file a Federal income tax return, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, a tax return under this article shall be made and filed by or for every taxpayer having income for the taxable year, except as otherwise provided for under section 304(e).* * *Section 3. The amendment or addition of sections 304(e) and 330(a) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0252PN0203 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718